New Jersey, session 222, S763.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:33-1 is amended to read as follows: 2C:33-1.     Riot; Failure to Disburse.  a.  Riot.  A person is guilty of riot if he participates with four or more others in a course of disorderly conduct as defined in section 2C:33-2a: (1)   With purpose to commit or facilitate the commission of a crime; (2)   With purpose to prevent or coerce official action; [or] (3)   When he or any other participant, known to him, uses or plans to use a firearm or other deadly weapon; or (4)   When he, with six or more others, causes damage to property or injury to another person. Riot if committed under circumstances set forth in paragraph (3) or paragraph (4) is a crime  of the third degree.  Otherwise riot is a crime of the fourth degree. b.    Failure of disorderly persons to disperse upon official order. Where five or more persons are participating in a course of disorderly conduct  as defined in section 2C:33-2 a. likely to cause substantial harm, a peace officer or other public servant engaged in executing or enforcing the law may order the participants and others in the immediate vicinity to disperse.  A person who refuses or knowingly fails to obey such an order commits a disorderly persons offense. (cf: P.L.1981, c.290, s.35) 2.    N.J.S.2C:33-2 is amended to read as follows: 2C:33-2.     Disorderly Conduct.  a.  Improper behavior.  A person is guilty of a petty disorderly persons offense, if with purpose to cause public inconvenience, annoyance or alarm, or  recklessly creating a risk thereof he (1)   Engages in fighting or threatening, or in violent or tumultuous behavior;  or (2)   Creates a hazardous or physically dangerous condition by any act which serves no legitimate purpose of the actor. b.    Offensive language.  A person is guilty of a petty disorderly persons offense if, in a public place, and with purpose to offend the sensibilities of a hearer or in reckless disregard of the probability of so doing, he addresses unreasonably loud and offensively coarse or abusive language, given the circumstances of the person present and the setting of the utterance, to any person present. "Public"  means affecting or likely to affect persons in a place to which the public or a substantial group has access;  among the places included are highways, transport facilities, schools, prisons, apartment houses, places of business or amusement, or any neighborhood. c.     A person is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree if during a riot he commits a violation of this section in a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement. Place of public accommodation, resort or amusement shall have the same meaning as in R.S.10:1-5. (cf: P.L.1978, c.95, s.2C:33-2) 3.    N.J.S.2C:33-7 is amended to read as follows: 2C:33-7.     Obstructing Highways and Other Public Passages.  a.  A person, who, having no legal privilege to do so, purposely or recklessly obstructs any highway or other public passage whether alone or with others, commits a petty disorderly persons offense.  A person who violates this section in a course of riot as defined in N.J.S.2C:33-1 or disorderly conduct as defined in subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:33-2, commits a crime of the fourth degree.  "Obstructs" means renders impassable without unreasonable inconvenience or hazard.  No person shall be deemed guilty of recklessly obstructing in violation of this subsection solely because of a gathering of persons to hear him speak or otherwise communicate, or solely because of being a member of such a gathering. b.    A person in a gathering commits a petty disorderly persons offense if he refuses to obey a reasonable official request or order to move: (1)   To prevent obstruction of a highway or other public passage; or (2)   To maintain public safety by dispersing those gathered in dangerous proximity to a fire or other hazard. An order to move, addressed to a person whose speech or other lawful behavior attracts an obstructing audience, shall not be deemed reasonable if the obstruction can be readily remedied by police control of the size or location of the gathering. (cf: P.L.1978, c.95, s.2C:33-7) 4.    N.J.S.2C:33-9 is amended to read as follows: 2C:33-9.  Desecration of venerated objects.  A person commits a disorderly persons offense if he purposely desecrates any public monument, insignia, symbol, or structure, or place of worship or burial.  It is a crime of the fourth degree if the desecration occurs during the course of a riot.  "Desecrate" means defacing, damaging, destroying, toppling or polluting. (cf: P.L.1978, c.95, s.2C:33-9) 5.    N.J.S.2C:12-1 is amended to read as follows: 2C:12-1.     Assault. a. Simple assault.  A person is guilty of assault if the person: (1)   Attempts to cause or purposely, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another; or (2)   Negligently causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (3)   Attempts by physical menace to put another in fear of imminent serious bodily injury. Simple assault is a disorderly persons offense unless committed in a fight or scuffle entered into by mutual consent, in which case it is a petty disorderly persons offense. b.   Aggravated assault.  A person is guilty of aggravated assault if the person: (1)   Attempts to cause serious bodily injury to another, or causes injury purposely or knowingly or under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life recklessly causes such injury; or (2)   Attempts to cause or purposely or knowingly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (3)   Recklessly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (4)   Knowingly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life points a firearm, as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of another, whether or not the actor believes it to be loaded; or (5)   Commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection a. of this section upon: (a)   Any law enforcement officer acting in the performance of the officer's duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of authority or because of the officer's status as a law enforcement officer; or (b)   Any paid or volunteer firefighter acting in the performance of the firefighter's duties while in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the duties of a firefighter; or (c)   Any person engaged in emergency first-aid or medical services acting in the performance of the person's duties while in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of emergency first-aid or medical services; or (d)   Any school board member, school administrator, teacher, school bus driver, or other employee of a public or nonpublic school or school board while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the person's duties or because of the person's status as a member or employee of a public or nonpublic school or school board or any school bus driver employed by an operator under contract to a public or nonpublic school or school board while  person's duties or because of the person's status as a school bus driver; or (e)   Any employee of the Division of Child Protection and Permanency while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the employee's duties or because of the status as an employee of the division; or (f)   Any justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Superior Court, judge of the Tax Court or municipal judge while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of judicial duties or because of the status as a member of the judiciary; or (g)   Any operator of a motorbus or the operator's supervisor or any employee of a rail passenger service while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the person's duties or because of the status as an operator of a motorbus or as the operator's supervisor or as an employee of a rail passenger service; or (h)   Any Department of Corrections employee, county correctional police officer, juvenile correctional police officer, State juvenile facility employee, juvenile detention staff member, juvenile detention officer, probation officer or any sheriff, undersheriff, or sheriff's officer acting in the performance of the person's duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of the person's authority or because of the status as a Department of Corrections employee, county correctional police officer, juvenile correctional police officer, State juvenile facility employee, juvenile detention staff member, juvenile detention officer, probation officer, sheriff, undersheriff, or sheriff's officer; or (i)    Any employee, including any person employed under contract, of a utility company as defined in section 2 of P.L.1971, c.224 (C.2A:42-86) or a cable television company subject to the provisions of the "Cable Television Act," P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.) while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the employee's duties in regard to connecting, disconnecting, or repairing or attempting to connect, disconnect, or repair any gas, electric, or water utility, or cable television or telecommunication service; or (j)    Any health care worker employed by a licensed health care facility to provide direct patient care, any health care professional licensed or otherwise authorized pursuant to Title 26 or Title 45 of the Revised Statutes to practice a health care profession, except a direct care worker at a State or county psychiatric hospital or State developmental center or veterans' memorial home, while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the duties of providing direct patient care or practicing the health care profession; or (k)   Any direct care worker at a State or county psychiatric hospital or State developmental center or veterans' memorial home, while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the duties of providing direct patient care or practicing the health care profession, provided that the actor is not a patient or resident at the facility who is classified by the facility as having a mental illness or developmental disability; or (6)   Causes bodily injury to another person while fleeing or attempting to elude a law enforcement officer in violation of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:29-2 or while operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:20-10.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall be strictly liable for a violation of this paragraph upon proof of a violation of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:29-2 or while operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:20-10 which resulted in bodily injury to another person; or (7)   Attempts to cause significant bodily injury to another or causes significant bodily injury purposely or knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life recklessly causes such significant bodily injury; or (8)   Causes bodily injury by knowingly or purposely starting a fire or causing an explosion in violation of N.J.S.2C:17-1 which results in bodily injury to any emergency services personnel involved in fire suppression activities, rendering emergency medical services resulting from the fire or explosion or rescue operations, or rendering any necessary assistance at the scene of the fire or explosion, including any bodily injury sustained while responding to the scene of a reported fire or explosion.  For purposes of this paragraph, "emergency services personnel" shall include, but not be limited to, any paid or volunteer firefighter, any person engaged in emergency first-aid or medical services and any law enforcement officer.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall be strictly liable for a violation of this paragraph upon proof of a violation of N.J.S.2C:17-1 which resulted in bodily injury to any emergency services personnel; or (9)   Knowingly, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, points or displays a firearm, as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of a law enforcement officer; or (10)    Knowingly points, displays or uses an imitation firearm, as defined in subsection v. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of a law enforcement officer with the purpose to intimidate, threaten, or attempt to put the officer in fear of bodily injury or for any unlawful purpose; or (11)    Uses or activates a laser sighting system or device, or a system or device which, in the manner used, would cause a reasonable person to believe that it is a laser sighting system or device, against a law enforcement officer acting in the performance of the officer's duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of the officer's authority.  As used in this paragraph, "laser sighting system or device" means any system or device that is integrated with or affixed to a firearm and emits a laser light beam that is used to assist in the sight alignment or aiming of the firearm; or (12)    Attempts to cause significant bodily injury or causes significant bodily injury purposely or knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, recklessly causes significant bodily injury to a person who, with respect to the actor, meets the definition of a victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); or (13)    Knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, recklessly obstructs the breathing or blood circulation of a person who, with respect to the actor, meets the definition of a victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19), by applying pressure on the throat or neck or blocking the nose or mouth of such person, thereby causing or attempting to cause bodily injury; (14)    Attempts to cause or purposely, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another in the course of a riot. Aggravated assault under paragraphs (1) and (6) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the second degree; under paragraphs (2), (7), (9), and (10) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree; under paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the fourth degree; and under paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree if the victim suffers bodily injury, or if, during the course of a riot, an object is thrown at or strikes a law enforcement officer, described in subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of this subsection, or the law enforcement officer is otherwise struck, the presumption of non-imprisonment set forth in subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:44-1 for a first offense of a crime of the third degree shall not apply, and a mandatory period of six months imprisonment shall apply, otherwise it is a crime of the fourth degree.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (8) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree if the victim suffers bodily injury; if the victim suffers significant bodily injury or serious bodily injury it is a crime of the second degree. Aggravated assault under paragraph (11) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (12) or (13) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree but the presumption of non-imprisonment set forth in subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:44-1 for a first offense of a crime of the third degree shall not apply.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (14) of this subsection is a crime of the third degree. c.     (1)  A person is guilty of assault by auto or vessel when the person drives a vehicle or vessel recklessly and causes either serious bodily injury or bodily injury to another.  Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the fourth degree if serious bodily injury results and is a disorderly persons offense if bodily injury results. Proof that the defendant was operating a hand-held wireless telephone while driving a motor vehicle in violation of section 1 of P.L.2003, c.310 (C.39:4-97.3) may give rise to an inference that the defendant was driving recklessly. (2)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if the person drives the vehicle while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) and serious bodily injury results and is a crime of the fourth degree if the person drives the vehicle while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) and bodily injury results. (3)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the second degree if serious bodily injury results from the defendant operating the auto or vessel while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) while: (a)   on any school property used for school purposes which is owned by or leased to any elementary or secondary school or school board, or within 1,000 feet of such school property; (b)   driving through a school crossing as defined in R.S.39:1-1 if the municipality, by ordinance or resolution, has designated the school crossing as such; or (c)   driving through a school crossing as defined in R.S.39:1-1 knowing that juveniles are present if the municipality has not designated the school crossing as such by ordinance or resolution. Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if bodily injury results from the defendant operating the auto or vessel in violation of this paragraph. A map or true copy of a map depicting the location and boundaries of the area on or within 1,000 feet of any property used for school purposes which is owned by or leased to any elementary or secondary school or school board produced pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) may be used in a prosecution under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (3) of this subsection. It shall be no defense to a prosecution for a violation of subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (3) of this subsection that the defendant was unaware that the prohibited conduct took place while on or within 1,000 feet of any school property or while driving through a school crossing.  Nor shall it be a defense to a prosecution under subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (3) of this subsection that no juveniles were present on the school property or crossing zone at the time of the offense or that the school was not in session. (4)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if the person purposely drives a vehicle in an aggressive manner directed at another vehicle and serious bodily injury results and is a crime of the fourth degree if the person purposely drives a vehicle in an aggressive manner directed at another vehicle and bodily injury results. For purposes of this paragraph, "driving a vehicle in an aggressive manner" shall include, but is not limited to, unexpectedly altering the speed of the vehicle, making improper or erratic traffic lane changes, disregarding traffic control devices, failing to yield the right of way, or following another vehicle too closely. As used in this subsection, "vessel" means a means of conveyance for travel on water and propelled otherwise than by muscular power. d.    A person who is employed by a facility as defined in section 2 of P.L.1977, c.239 (C.52:27G-2) who commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection a. of this section upon an institutionalized elderly person as defined in section 2 of P.L.1977, c.239 (C.52:27G-2) is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. e.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.443). f.     A person who commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection a. of this section in the presence of a child under 16 years of age at a school or community sponsored youth sports event is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. The defendant shall be strictly liable upon proof that the offense occurred, in fact, in the presence of a child under 16 years of age.  It shall not be a defense that the defendant did not know that the child was present or reasonably believed that the child was 16 years of age or older.  The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to create any liability on the part of a participant in a youth sports event or to abrogate any immunity or defense available to a participant in a youth sports event.  As used in this act, "school or community sponsored youth sports event" means a competition, practice, or instructional event involving one or more interscholastic sports teams or youth sports teams organized pursuant to a nonprofit or similar charter or which are member teams in a youth league organized by or affiliated with a county or municipal recreation department and shall not include collegiate, semi-professional or professional sporting events. (cf: P.L.2019, c.219, s.3) 6.    (New section)  Crime of promotion of violent, disorderly assembly.  a.  A person promotes violent, disorderly assembly if he conspires with others as an organizer, supervisor, financier or manager to commit any crime specified in chapters 11 through 18, 20, 33, 35, or 37 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; N.J.S.2C:34-1; N.J.S.2C:39-3; N.J.S.2C:39-4; section 1 of P.L.1998, c.26 (C.2C:39-4.1); N.J.S.2C:39-5; or N.J.S.2C:39-9 in the course of a riot or at the site of a peaceable assembly. b.    Grading.  Promotion of violent, disorderly assembly is a crime of one degree higher than the most serious underlying crime referred to in subsection a. of this section, except that where the underlying offense is a crime of the first degree, promotion of violent, disorderly assembly is a first degree crime and the defendant, upon conviction, and notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection a of N.J.S.2C:43-6, shall be sentenced to an ordinary term of imprisonment between 15 and 30 years. 7.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT In light of the exponentially greater risk of injury and damage caused by crowd-based destructive behavior, this omnibus bill addresses certain crimes committed during the course of riot or crowd-based behavior.  Presently, under N.J.S.A.2C:33-1, a person is guilty of riot if he participates with four or more others in a course of disorderly conduct with an unlawful purpose, enumerated in the statute.  This bill amends N.J.S.A.2C:33-1 to expand the categories of unlawful purposes to include when the actor, with six or more others, causes damage to property or injury to another.  Riot under these circumstances is a crime of the fourth degree punishable by up to 18 months imprisonment, a fine of up to $10,000, or both. The bill amends N.J.S.A.2C:33-2, Disorderly Conduct, which currently provides that a person commits a petty disorderly persons offense if he commits certain prohibited acts.  This bill creates a new subsection c. to provide that a person commits a crime of the fourth degree if, during a riot, he engages in disorderly conduct in a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement.  Under the bill, Place of public accommodation, resort or amusement includes any inn, tavern, road house or hotel, whether for entertainment of transient guests or accommodation of those seeking  health, recreation or rest; any restaurant, eating house, or place where food is sold for consumption on the premises; any place maintained for sale of ice cream, ice and fruit preparations or their derivatives, soda water or confections, or where any beverages of any kind are retailed for consumption on the premises; any garage, any public conveyance operated on land or water, and  stations and terminals thereof; any public bathhouse, public boardwalk, public seashore accommodation; any theater, or other place of public amusement, motion-picture house, airdrome, music hall, roof garden, skating rink, amusement and recreation park, fair, bowling alley, gymnasium, shooting gallery, billiard and pool parlor; any dispensary, clinic, hospital, public  library, kindergarten, primary and secondary school, high school, academy, college and university, or any educational institution under the supervision of  the regents of the State of New Jersey.  Under these circumstances, the offense is a crime of the fourth degree. The bill amends N.J.S.A.2C:33-7, Obstructing highways and other public passages, to elevate the offense to a crime of the fourth degree if a person, who, having no legal privilege to do so, purposely or recklessly obstructs any highway or other public passage in the course of committing riot or disorderly conduct. The bill amends N.J.S.2C:33-9, Desecration of venerated objects, to elevate the offense to a crime of the fourth degree if the desecration occurs during a riot.  The term desecrate is clarified to include conduct such as actual destruction or the toppling of a monument. The bill amends N.J.S.2C:12-1, Assault.  Currently, the statute enumerates the circumstances when aggravated assault occurs; this bill adds the additional circumstance.  Under the bill, a person is guilty of aggravated assault if he attempts to cause or purposely, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another in the course of a riot.  Aggravated assault under this circumstance is a crime of the third degree, punishable by three to five years imprisonment, a fine of up to $15,000, or both. Additionally, paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.A.2C:12-1 elevates simple assault to aggravated assault when committed against certain categories of persons, including when committed against a law enforcement officer acting in the performance of the officers duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of authority or because of the officers status as a law enforcement officer, and is graded as a crime of the third degree.  Under the bill, if, in the course of a riot, an object is thrown at a law enforcement officer, or if the law enforcement officer is struck, whether or not with an object, the presumption of non-imprisonment for a first offense of a crime of the third degree shall not apply, and a mandatory period of six months imprisonment shall apply. The bill creates the new crime of promotion of violent, disorderly assembly.  A person promotes violent, disorderly assembly if he conspires with others as an organizer, supervisor, financier or manager to commit any crime specified in chapters 11 through 18, 20, 33, 35, or 37 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; N.J.S.2C:34-1; N.J.S.2C:39-3; N.J.S.2C:39-4; section 1 of P.L.1998, c.26 (C.2C:39-4.1); N.J.S.2C:39-5; or N.J.S.2C:39-9 in the course of a riot or at the site of a peaceable assembly.  Promotion of violent, disorderly assembly is a crime of one degree higher than the most serious underlying crime referred to in subsection a. of this section, except that where the underlying offense is a crime of the first degree, promotion of violent, disorderly assembly is a first degree crime and the defendant, upon conviction, and notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection a of N.J.S.2C:43-6, shall be sentenced to an ordinary term of imprisonment between 15 and 30 years. This bill is based upon a legislation concept entitled, Combatting Violence, Disorder and Looting and Law Enforcement Protection Act, articulated in the media concerning an announcement made by Florida Governor Ron DeSantis.